West Virginia, session 2026, HB5361.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 16. Federal Immigration Enforcement. §15-16-2a. Regarding certain immigration enforcement actions in specific locations. (a) As used in this act:(1) "Educational institution" means any school, or physical facility in which a "local educational agency" is located, as that term is defined in §18-1-1;(2) "Enforcement action" means any of the following actions taken by a law enforcement officer for the purpose of immigration enforcement or to obtain information in regard to an individual's immigration or citizenship status:(A) Arresting or detaining an individual.(B) Conducting search or surveillance.(3) "Place of worship" means a church, synagogue, mosque, or other institution of worship, including, but not limited to, a building rented for a religious service.(4) "Sensitive location" means all of the following:(A) An educational institution;(B) A place of worship;(C) A hospital;(D) A courthouse; or(E) The site of an organization that is assisting children, pregnant women, victims of crime or abuse, or an individual with significant mental or physical disabilities.(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article to the contrary, and except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a law enforcement officer may not conduct an immigration enforcement action in a sensitive location.(2) A law enforcement officer may conduct an immigration enforcement action in a sensitive location if a court order directs the law enforcement officer conducting the immigration enforcement action to enter the sensitive location.(3) A law enforcement officer may conduct an immigration enforcement action in a sensitive location if the immigration enforcement action is necessary to address a threat that poses imminent danger to public safety.